Hawaii, session 2026, HB2265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's research and development ecosystem requires flexible funding to leverage federal investment opportunities.  Federal and non-federal programs administered by the Advanced Research Projects Agency, United States Department of Energy, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, United States Department of Defense, and other agencies and organizations offer competitive awards to advance high‑impact technologies.  These awards often require matching funds from state or private sources as a condition of participation. The legislature further finds that section 206M-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, currently authorizes the Hawaii technology development corporation to provide grants to businesses applying for federal small business innovation research or small business technology transfer awards, but does not expressly permit the use of state funds to support applicants for other federal research and development grant programs or to meet matching requirements for those awards. The purpose of this Act is to expand the allowable uses of funds under section 206M-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to include providing grants to applicants for qualifying federal research and development awards and matching funds for recipients of those awards and related contracts. SECTION 2.  Section 206M-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The development corporation may provide grants to any business in Hawaii that: (1)  Receives a federal small business innovation research phase I or II award or contract from any participating federal agency, up to fifty per cent of the amount of the federal award or contract; (2)  Receives a federal small business technology transfer program award or contract from any participating federal agency, up to fifty per cent of the amount of the federal award or contract; (3)  Receives a federal small business innovation research phase III or small business technology transfer program phase III award or contract, up to fifty per cent of the amount of the award or contract funded by private sector or government sources outside of the program; [or] (4)  Applies for a [small business innovation research federal grant or a small business technology transfer program federal grant,] federal research and development grant, in an amount not to exceed $3,000[,]; or (5)  Receives a federal research and development award or contract from a United States government agency that requires a non‑federal match on a matching basis, in an amount not to exceed fifty percent of the amount of the required non‑federal share, subject to the availability of funds." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST